Washington statutes.
RCW 18.92.240

Violations generally—Penalty.

Violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, or of any rule or regulation made pursuant thereto, shall constitute a misdemeanor and punishable by fine of not less than fifty dollars.

[ 1941 c 71 s 24; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 10040-24.]